Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2319.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the payment of death benefits to the surviving spouse or children or parents of firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers, telecommunicators or National Guard members who die as a result of the performance of their duties.Section 2. Section 1(a), (a.1) and (d) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to 1234567891011121314151617181920 read:Section 1. (a) In the event a law enforcement officer, telecommunicator , ambulance service or rescue squad member, firefighter, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or National Guard member dies as a result of the performance of his duties, an application, including a certification of death, shall be made to the department within three years of the date of such death by any of the following:(1) A political subdivision.(2) A Commonwealth agency.(3) In the case of National Guard members, the Adjutant General.(4) In the case of a member of a Commonwealth law enforcement agency, the agency head.(5) In the case of a campus police officer, the university or college president.(6) Any survivor eligible for payment of benefits under this act or individual authorized to act on the survivor's behalf.(7) In the case of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol, the State Commander.(a.1) A firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member, law enforcement officer, telecommunicator, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or National Guard member who suffers a fatal heart attack or stroke while on duty or not later than 24 hours after participating in a physical training exercise or responding to an emergency is presumed to have died as a result of the performance of his duties for purposes of this act.20260HB2319PN3093 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(d) Upon receipt of such certification, the Commonwealth shall, from moneys payable out of the General Fund, pay to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the minor children of the paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or telecommunicator who died as a result of the performance of his duty the sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section and an amount equal to the monthly salary, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, of the deceased paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or telecommunicator, less any workers' compensation or pension or retirement benefits paid to such survivors, and shall continue such monthly payments until there is no eligible beneficiary to receive them. For the purpose of this subsection, the term "eligible beneficiary" means the surviving spouse or the child or children under the age of eighteen years or, if attending college, under the age of twenty-three years, of the firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or telecommunicator who died as a result of the performance of his duty. When no spouse or minor children survive, a single sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, shall be paid to the parent or parents of such firefighter, ambulance service member, rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or telecommunicator.* * *(h) A telecommunicator shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of his duties for the purposes of this act when acting in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 (relating to 911 20260HB2319PN3093 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency communication services).Section 3. Sections 2 and 2.1 of the act are amended to read:Section 2. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified hazardous material response team member" means a person who is part of a group of individuals who are certified and organized by a Commonwealth agency, a local agency or a regional hazardous material organization for the primary purpose of providing emergency response services which is dispatched by a public safety answering point to mitigate actual or potential immediate threats to public health and the environment in response to the release or threat of a release of a hazardous material, which is certified, trained and equipped in accordance with the act of December 7, 1990 (P.L.639, No.165), known as the Hazardous Material Emergency Planning and Response Act. Hazardous material response team members who are dispatched by a public safety answering point may also be certified to perform stabilization actions needed to remove threats to public health and the environment from hazardous material releases. A member of a for-profit hazardous material response team that was not dispatched by a public safety answering point, is acting as an agent on behalf of the spiller or responsible party or is responsible for post-emergency or nonemergency response hazardous materials/hazardous waste clean-up activities is not eligible for compensation that is provided for under this act."Department" means the Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member or law 20260HB2319PN3093 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement officer" means a firefighter; a member of a volunteer fire company; a member of an ambulance service or rescue squad; a peace officer as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions); a public servant concerned in official detention as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5121 (relating to escape); an officer or employee of a State correctional institution; guards or employees of county jails and prisons; or any other law enforcement officer employed by the Commonwealth or a political subdivision."Public safety answering point" means the Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency-approved first point at which calls for emergency assistance from individuals are answered, operated 24 hours a day."Telecommunicator" means an individual employed by a public safety answering point as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 5302 (relating to definitions), whose primary responsibility is to receive, process, transmit or dispatch emergency and nonemergency calls for service for emergency medical, fire and rescue, law enforcement or other public safety services via telephone, radio or other communication device. The term includes call takers, emergency dispatchers and supervisors.Section 2.1. This act shall be broadly construed to grant benefits to firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers [or], telecommunicators or National Guard personnel for deaths related to the performance of their duties.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2319PN3093 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627